Hawaii statutes.
[§167-14] Petition of Hawaiian homes
commission for formation of irrigation project, community pastures. The
Hawaiian homes commission may petition the board of agriculture to organize
irrigation projects for any of the lands designated as "available lands"
in the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, whether or not the lands are
occupied in whole or in part. If the lands for which the proposed project is
to be organized are not occupied or are occupied by persons whose rights to
occupancy will expire before the project water will be supplied to the lands,
no notice need be published nor public hearing held as in section 167-16
required. Project water may be supplied to community pastures established by
the Hawaiian homes commission within any project even though the pastures
exceed one hundred acres in area. Before the board commences any irrigation
project involving community pastures it shall require agreement from the
Hawaiian homes commission that tolls for water supplied to and acreage
assessments upon the pastures shall be paid by the commission. Before the
board commences any irrigation project involving available lands which the
Hawaiian homes commission desires to develop and open for small scale farming
it shall require agreement from the Hawaiian homes commission that in the event
the development and opening of the lands does not enable the making of acreage
assessments sufficient to repay the costs of construction of the project that
the same will be paid by the commission. The payments referred to in this
section may be made by the Hawaiian homes commission from any of its funds
designated or created by Congress for that purpose. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next